Wyoming, session 2026, SF0064.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-7-126 is created to read:

9-7-126. Wyoming housing revolving loan program;
account; requirements.

SF0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0314
(a) The legislature finds and declares that:

(i) There is in this state a critical shortage
of adequate, affordable housing;

(ii) It is in the public interest of the
citizens of this state to facilitate the provision of
adequate, affordable housing and workforce housing in order
to promote the economic welfare of the state and its
residents by retaining a talented workforce, increasing
employment opportunities, addressing rising home costs and
fostering economic stability, thus improving the state's
economy;

(iii) It is the purpose of this section to
promote strong Wyoming communities by providing loans for
adequate, affordable housing and workforce housing
necessary to create economic benefit to the state;

(iv) This section constitutes a valid public
purpose of primary benefit to the state of Wyoming.

SF0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0314
(b) There is created the Wyoming housing revolving
loan program. The authority shall administer the program
under this section. The authority shall promulgate all
rules necessary to administer and implement the program.

(c) There is created the Wyoming housing revolving
loan account. The authority shall manage and administer the
account. All funds within the account are continuously
appropriated to the authority for purposes of this section.
The account shall consist of all funds transferred or
deposited to the account from any source and all monies
collected from federal grants and other contributions,
grants, gifts, bequests and donations to the account. Funds
in the account at the end of a fiscal biennium shall not
lapse and shall not revert as provided in W.S. 9-4-207 but
shall remain in the account to implement this section.

(d) The Wyoming housing revolving loan account shall
be available for the following projects in the following
amounts:

(i) Not more than eighty percent (80%) of the
account balance shall be expended for loans to local
SF0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0314
governments, housing authorities and nonprofit entities for
the following purposes and subject to the following
conditions:

(A) Loans under this paragraph shall be
made only for:

(I) New construction of adequate,
affordable housing or workforce housing, including land
acquisition, infrastructure and building materials and
labor costs;

(II) Rehabilitation of existing
housing in order to provide adequate, affordable housing or
workforce housing;

(III) The purchase of land or other
property to be used for adequate, affordable housing and
workforce housing.

(B) Loans made under this paragraph shall
be disbursed only to local governments, housing authorities
and nonprofit entities located in Wyoming;
SF0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0314

(C) Loans issued under this paragraph shall
have an interest rate as established by rule of the
authority, provided that the interest rate established
under this subparagraph shall not exceed the United States
effective federal funds rate;

(D) Funds repaid from any loan issued under
this paragraph shall be deposited in the Wyoming housing
revolving loan account.

(ii) Not more than twenty percent (20%) of the
account balance shall be expended for loans to local
governments, housing authorities and nonprofits for the
following purposes and subject to the following conditions:

(A) Loans under this paragraph shall be
made only for:

(I) Planning for adequate, affordable
housing projects or workforce housing projects;

SF0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0314
(II) Predevelopment expenses for an
adequate, affordable housing or workforce housing project,
including architectural drawings and other design plans.

(B) Loans shall be made only to local
governments, housing authorities and nonprofit entities
located in Wyoming;

(C) Loans issued under this paragraph shall
specify an interest rate of zero percent (0%);

(D) Funds repaid from any loan issued under
this paragraph shall be deposited in the Wyoming housing
revolving loan account.

(e) The authority shall establish an application
process for the loans that are available under this
section. The authority may establish an administrative fee
for the ongoing monitoring of projects receiving loans
under this section to ensure that the projects remain in
compliance with this section and any associated rules.

SF0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0314
(f) No loan shall be made under this section without
the written opinion of the attorney general certifying the
legality of the transaction and all documents connected
therewith.

(g) Not later than November 1 of each year, the
authority shall report to the joint appropriations
committee on:

(i) The balance of the Wyoming housing revolving
loan account;

(ii) All loans made in the immediately preceding
fiscal year under this section, including the recipients of
each loan and the purpose for which the loan was made;

(iii) All outstanding loans made under this
section, and the balance of each loan;

(iv) Any recommendations for legislation for the
Wyoming housing revolving loan program.

Section 2. W.S. 9-7-103(a)(xvi) is amended to read:
SF0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0314

9-7-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xvi) "This act" means W.S. 9-7-101 through
9-7-125 9-7-126.

Section 3.

(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, on
July 1, 2026, the state auditor shall transfer thirty
million dollars ($30,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is
available, from the strategic investments and projects
account to the Wyoming housing revolving loan account
created in section 1 of this act.

(b) If the strategic investments and projects account
is repealed effective on or before July 1, 2026, then the
transfer required under subsection (a) of this section
shall not be made. In that event, on July 1, 2026, the
state auditor shall transfer thirty million dollars
($30,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, from
SF0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0314
the legislative stabilization reserve account to the
Wyoming housing revolving loan account created in section 1
of this act. The transfer from the legislative
stabilization reserve account specified in this subsection
shall only be made if no transfer is made under subsection
(a) of this section.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0064